Oklahoma, session 2025, SB241.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma


Department of Commerce from any monies not otherwise appropriated


from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal


year ending June 30, 2024, the sum of Twenty Million Dollars


($20,000,000.00) for the purpose of providing a rebate for capital


investments in an establishment that refines, manufactures, or


processes compounds or elements into hydrogen-based products in


industries defined or classified in the North American Industry


Classification System (NAICS) Manual under Subsector 324 or 325 or


so much thereof as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed


upon the Oklahoma Department of Commerce by law.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1441 JC 12/30/2024 5:21:09 PM



Req. No. 1441 Page 1